Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5135
Leased property.

An insurer may invest in obligations secured by an assignment of a lease to or for the benefit of the insurer and the rents payable under the lease if:

(1) The lessee or ultimate guarantor of any lease securing the obligation is an entity the obligations of which are authorized for investment under sections 44-5123 to 44-5131;

(2) The rentals assigned are sufficient to repay not less than ninety percent of the obligation within the unexpired term of the lease excluding any term that may be provided by an enforceable option of renewal; and

(3) A first lien on the lessor's interest in the unencumbered leased property is obtained as additional security for the obligation for which the rentals described in subdivision (2) of this section are not sufficient to repay the obligation.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 35.